Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 2. Equipment and Machinery

§ 30-3-201.
Aerial trams, belts and conveyors.

Aerial trams, belts, conveyors or other transporting equipment shall be adequate for the purpose used and shall be installed and maintained in good workmanlike manner in accordance with recognized good, safe engineering practice and with rules adopted by the inspector.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 30-65; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-402

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, § 1.

§ 30-3-202.
Bins and chutes.

All bins shall be designed and constructed to hold and maintain the load required.

Chutes for discharging bins shall be of approved design, and arranged to be conveniently and safely operated, with a uniform flow to lessen arching of stored material.

Open top bins shall be protected by adequate guardrails and toeboards.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 30-66; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-403

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-3-203.
Boilers and compressed air receivers; inspections.

All boilers used for generating steam shall be kept in good order. The owner or operator shall have them inspected and approved in accordance with rules adopted by the inspector.

All compressed air receivers shall be built and installed according to standard specifications and shall be inspected and approved in accordance with rules adopted by the inspector.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 30-67; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-404

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, § 1.

§ 30-3-204.
Machinery; standard safety methods and devices required.

All machinery shall be guarded by standard approved methods and devices which shall adequately provide protection against accidents and prevent all access to the danger zones during operation.

All persons shall avail themselves of protective devices, shall observe all rules governing their maintenance and operation and shall promptly report to the operator or supervisor any unsafe condition or the lack of any protective device.

No employee or person or persons shall knowingly do any willful act to injure or destroy any machinery, which will thereby endanger the safety of persons, working places or property.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 54; W.S. 1957, § 30-89; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-426; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: industrial accidents involving conveyor belts or systems, 2 ALR4th 262.

§ 30-3-205.
Cutter chains; enumeration of equipment to be guarded; control of dust when drilling; repairing or oiling moving machinery prohibited.

The cutter chains of mining machines shall be locked securely by mechanical means to prevent accidental movement while being trammed or when parked. The inspector shall adopt rules providing for the adequate guarding of equipment with protruding bolts, nuts, blades, flywheels, belts, chains and other mechanisms which can cause serious injury and with which persons are likely to come into contact.

Drilling in rock shall be done wet or with other means of dust control approved by the inspector.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Machinery shall not be repaired or oiled while in motion.

A guard or safety device removed from any machine shall be replaced before the machine is put in operation.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, §§ 55, 56; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-181, 30-182; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-3-456, 30-3-457; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, §§ 1, 2.

§ 30-3-206.
Use of internal combustion engines prohibited; exception.

The use of equipment underground powered by internal combustion engines is prohibited except for those engines conforming to standards accepted by the MSHA for underground internal combustion engines. Equipment with engines conforming with rules adopted by the MSHA shall only be used and operated as authorized by rule of the inspector.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 40, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 57-443; 1951, ch. 128, § 41; 1957, ch. 160, § 58; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-93, 30-144, 30-167; Laws 1959, ch. 124, § 4; 1973, ch. 105, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-430, 30-3-442; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, §§ 1, 2.

§ 30-3-207.
Locomotives generally.

Locomotives shall be equipped with proper devices for rerailing of locomotives and cars.

An audible warning device and headlights shall be provided on each locomotive, shuttle car and any other self-propelled mobile equipment used underground.

Where hoists are used for handling men in underground slopes, in pitching beds, or on slopes between two (2) or more beds, the provisions governing hoisting or haulage mentioned heretofore shall apply.

A permissible trip light shall be used on the rear of trips pulled, and on the front of trips lowered into slopes or pushed. Trip lights need not be used during gathering operations at working faces.

Pushing of cars on main haulage roads and back-poling is prohibited except as authorized by rule of the inspector.

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

through (q) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

The inspector shall adopt rules establishing the authorized use of locomotives, including persons authorized to ride, materials which may be hauled, and requirements for boarding, loading, derailing, blocking, coupling and trip lighting.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 42; W.S. 1957, § 30-168; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-443; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to authority of mining corporations relative to the construction of railroads, roads, etc., see §

30-1-128

.

As to construction, installation and maintenance of track, see §

30-3-114

.

§ 30-3-208.
Man-trips operated by locomotives; belt lines; illumination of stations.

Man-trips operated by locomotives shall be pulled at safe speed consistent with the condition of roads and type of equipment used, and shall be so controlled that they can be stopped within the limits of visibility. The speed of man-trips on slopes shall be consistent with the condition of roads and type of equipment used and shall be limited to speeds established by rules of the inspector.

Each man-trip shall be under the charge of a qualified person and shall be operated independently of any loaded trip of material.

Cars on the man-trip shall not be overloaded. Sufficient cars in good mechanical condition shall be provided.

No person shall ride under the trolley wire unless suitable covered man-cars are used.

No material or tools shall be transported in the same car with persons on any man-trip. All persons except the motorman and trip rider shall ride inside of man-trip cars.

Persons shall not load or unload from moving man-trip cars. Persons shall proceed in an orderly manner to and from man-trips.

A waiting station with sufficient room and ample clearance from moving equipment shall be provided where persons are required to wait for man-trips or man-cages.

Trolley and power wires shall be guarded effectively at man-trip stations where there is a possibility of any person coming in contact with energized electric wiring while loading or unloading from the man-trip.

Loading and unloading stations shall be illuminated properly.

A qualified person shall supervise the loading and unloading of man-trips.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 43; W.S. 1957, § 30-169; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-444; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 30-3-209.
Standards and use of hoisting equipment established by rule.

The inspector shall establish by rule requirements for the operation of hoisting equipment. The rules shall include permissible materials, manning and training requirements, load limitations, guard requirements for trolley and power wires, and illumination and recordkeeping requirements.

through (m) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 37; 1957, ch. 160, §§ 32, 33; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-70, 30-71, 30-163; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-407

,

30-2-408

, 30-3-438; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, §§ 1, 2.

§ 30-3-210.
Cages; standards and use established by rule.

Cages used for hoisting persons shall be of substantial construction with:

Adequate steel bonnets;

Enclosed sides;

Gates, safety chains or bars across the ends of the cage when persons are being hoisted or lowered;

Sufficient handholds or chains for all persons on the cage to maintain their balance.

The floor of the cage shall be adequate to carry the load and so constructed that it will be impossible for a person’s foot or body to enter any opening in the bottom of the cage.

Cages used for handling persons shall be equipped with safety catches that act quickly and effectively in an emergency.

Cages shall be inspected daily. Safety catches on cages shall be tested at least every two (2) months. A written record shall be kept of inspections and tests. The record may be inspected by interested persons.

through (p) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

The inspector shall establish by rule standards for cages used for hoisting persons. To the extent possible, emergency hoists shall comply with these standards.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 38; W.S. 1957, § 30-164; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-439; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “that” in (b).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”